Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB494.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall only apply to administrative regulations
promulgated or filed by:
(a) An administrative body listed in KRS 13A.105(3);
(b) An office, division, or other unit within an administrative body listed in KRS
13A.105(3); or
(c) An occupational board or commission established in KRS Chapters 309 to
335.
(2) (a) Any administrative regulation in effect prior to the effective date of this Act
shall be exempt from the final legislative approval process established in
Sections 1 to 3 of this Act until July 1, 2031.
(b) On or after July 1, 2031, any administrative regulation not exempted under
this section, regardless of its effective date, shall be subject to the final
legislative approval process established in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
(3) If an ordinary administrative regulation is necessary to prevent a loss of federal
or state funding, it shall go into effect after completing the administrative
regulation review process under this chapter, but that administrative regulation
shall expire upon the next sine die adjournment of a regular session if not first
ratified by the General Assembly in accordance with Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
(4) Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall not be interpreted to reverse or modify any section
of this chapter that became law prior to the effective date of this Act if that
section's primary purpose is to codify any legislative committee's finding of
deficiency regarding one (1) or more administrative regulations.
(5) (a) An ordinary administrative regulation shall not be final and enforceable
Page 1 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
until it is:
1. Considered adopted under Section 7 of this Act; and
2. Affirmatively ratified by legislation passed in accordance with Section
3 of this Act that becomes a law.
(b) If an ordinary administrative regulation is not affirmatively and specifically
ratified by legislation passed in accordance with Section 3 of this Act that
becomes a law, that administrative regulation shall be void.
(c) If an effective emergency administrative regulation that has completed the
review process under this chapter is not affirmatively and specifically
ratified by legislation passed in accordance with Section 3 of this Act that
becomes a law, it shall expire upon the next sine die adjournment of a
regular session.
(6) An administrative regulation shall be exempt from the ratification process
established in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act if the following conditions are met:
(a) The administrative regulation was granted final legislative approval and
was ratified in accordance with Sections 1 to 3 of this Act in a previous
regular session; and
(b) The administrative regulation has not been amended or modified in any
way, except for technical corrections authorized by Section 5 of this Act and
KRS 13A.312, since it was most recently ratified in accordance with
Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
(7) An administrative body may promulgate an emergency administrative regulation
only as authorized by this chapter.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) If an administrative regulation is received on or before March 1, the
Page 2 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
General Assembly shall have until the last day of the regular legislative
session of that year to review and act upon the administrative regulation;
and
(b) If an administrative regulation is received after March 1, the General
Assembly shall have until the last day of the regular legislative session of
the next year to review and act upon the administrative regulation.
(2) (a) By enacting legislation in accordance with Section 3 of this Act, the General
Assembly:
1. Grants final legislative approval to any administrative regulation
specifically included in the ratification list contained in the legislation;
and
2. Disapproves any administrative regulation that is subject to Section 1
of this Act and not:
a. Specifically included in the ratification list contained in the
legislation; or
b. Exempted under subsection (6) of Section 1 of this Act.
(b) An administrative regulation disapproved under paragraph (a)2. of this
subsection shall be void or expire in accordance with subsection (5) of
Section 1 of this Act.
(3) Unless otherwise authorized by the General Assembly, the administrative body
that promulgated or filed an administrative regulation that is disapproved by the
General Assembly in accordance with subsection (2)(a)2. of this section shall:
(a) File notice of the General Assembly's disapproval with the regulations
compiler for publication in the Administrative Register; and
(b) Not submit an identical administrative regulation before sine die
adjournment of the next regular legislative session.
(4) (a) Upon ratification and final legislative approval of administrative
Page 3 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
regulations in accordance with Sections 1 to 3 of this Act, each
administrative body shall submit a list of its ratified administrative
regulations to the regulations compiler.
(b) The regulations compiler shall add the data from any list of ratified
administrative regulations submitted by an administrative body under
paragraph (a) of this subsection to the list required by subsection (13) of
Section 5 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The regulations compiler shall submit to the Committee on Committees of each
chamber each administrative regulation that is subject to Section 1 of this Act
and:
(a) Considered adopted under Section 7 of this Act; or
(b) An effective emergency administrative regulation that has completed the
administrative regulation review process under this chapter.
(2) (a) Upon receipt of any filed or promulgated administrative regulations from
the regulations compiler, the Committee on Committees of each chamber
shall assign the administrative regulations to the appropriate committees for
review.
(b) Each committee shall submit its recommendation to the full chamber within
two (2) weeks after the committee's receipt of an administrative regulation.
(c) The full chamber may consider a committee's recommendation regarding
ratification of each administrative regulation when passing legislation in
accordance with this section.
(3) The General Assembly may prepare omnibus administrative regulation approval
legislation for consideration each regular session.
(4) (a) The administrative regulation approval legislation shall be substantially in
Page 4 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
the following form:
"All proposed emergency and ordinary administrative regulations subject to
Section 1 of this Act filed on or before March 1 are hereby void and
disapproved, except for the following:".
(b) The legislation shall list all administrative regulations being ratified and
receiving final legislative approval.
(c) If an entire range, chapter, or title of administrative regulations is ratified,
listing that range, chapter, or title in the legislation shall constitute
ratification of all administrative regulations within that range, chapter, or
title.
(5) If an administrative regulation subject to Section 1 of this Act is not affirmatively
and specifically ratified and given final legislative approval through legislation
under this section or is not exempted under subsection (6) of Section 1 of this Act,
that administrative regulation shall be void or shall expire in accordance with
subsection (5) of Section 1 of this Act.
(6) If omnibus administrative regulation approval legislation fails to pass both
houses of the General Assembly or otherwise fails to become a law, the Governor
may, by May 15 of that same year, declare all administrative regulations subject
to that legislation to be approved, finally adopted, and enforceable by filing a
single declaration with the regulations compiler for publication in the
Administrative Register.
Section 4. KRS 13A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administrative body" means each state board, bureau, cabinet, commission,
department, authority, officer, or other entity, except the General Assembly and the
Court of Justice, authorized by law to promulgate administrative regulations;
(2) "Administrative regulation" means each statement of general applicability
Page 5 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
promulgated by an administrative body that implements, interprets, or prescribes
law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice requirements of
any administrative body. The term includes an existing administrative regulation, a
new administrative regulation, an emergency administrative regulation, an
administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute, and the amendment or
repeal of an existing administrative regulation, but does not include:
(a) Statements concerning only the internal management of an administrative
body and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the public;
(b) Declaratory rulings;
(c) Intradepartmental memoranda not in conflict with KRS 13A.130;
(d) Statements relating to acquisition of property for highway purposes and
statements relating to the construction or maintenance of highways; or
(e) Rules, regulations, and policies of the governing boards of institutions that
make up the postsecondary education system defined in KRS 164.001
pertaining to students attending or applicants to the institutions, to faculty and
staff of the respective institutions, or to the control and maintenance of land
and buildings occupied by the respective institutions;
(3) "Adopted" means that an administrative regulation has become effective in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
(4) "Authorizing signature" means the signature of the head of the administrative body
authorized by statute to promulgate administrative regulations;
(5) "Commission" means the Legislative Research Commission;
(6) "Effective" means an administrative regulation that has completed the legislative
committee review established by KRS 13A.290, 13A.330, and 13A.331(1). The
effective status of an administrative regulation is subject to ratification or
disapproval under Sections 1 to 3 of this Act;
(7) "Federal mandate" means any federal constitutional, legislative, or executive law or
Page 6 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
order that requires or permits any administrative body to engage in regulatory
activities that impose compliance standards, reporting requirements, recordkeeping,
or similar responsibilities upon entities in the Commonwealth;
(8) "Federal mandate comparison" means a written statement containing the
information required by KRS 13A.245;
(9) "Filed" or "promulgated" means that an administrative regulation, or other
document required to be filed by this chapter, has been submitted to the
Commission in accordance with this chapter;
(10) "Final legislative approval" means the process by which an administrative
regulation has been ratified through enacted legislation in accordance with
Sections 1 to 3 of this Act;
(11) "Full review" means that a filed administrative regulation is on an agenda for:
(a) The subcommittee as the last step required by this chapter prior to assignment
in accordance with KRS 13A.290(6);
(b) A legislative committee as the last step required by this chapter for an
ordinary administrative regulation before becoming effective upon
adjournment in accordance with KRS 13A.331(1)(a) and (b)[(2)]; or
(c) A legislative committee as an emergency administrative regulation being
reviewed after assignment in accordance with KRS 13A.290(6) and (7);
(12)[(11)] "Last effective date" means the latter of:
(a) The most recent date an ordinary administrative regulation became effective,
without including the date a technical amendment was made pursuant to KRS
13A.040(10), 13A.2255(2), or 13A.312; or
(b) The date a certification letter was filed with the regulations compiler for that
administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.3104(4), if the letter stated
that the administrative regulation shall remain in effect without amendment;
(13)[(12)] "Legislative committee" means an interim joint committee, a House or Senate
Page 7 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
standing committee, a statutory committee, or a subcommittee of the Legislative
Research Commission;
(14)[(13)] "Local government" means and includes a city, county, urban-county, charter
county, consolidated local government, special district, or a quasi-governmental
body authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or a local ordinance;
(15)[(14)] "Major economic impact" means the combined implementation and
compliance costs of an administrative regulation are at least five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) over any two (2) year period;
(16)[(15)] "Proposed administrative regulation" means an administrative regulation that:
(a) Has been filed by an administrative body; and
(b) Has not become effective or been withdrawn;
(17) "Ratified" means an administrative regulation that has been given final
legislative approval through legislation enacted in accordance with Sections 1 to
3 of this Act;
(18)[(16)] "Regulatory impact analysis" means a written statement containing the
provisions required by KRS 13A.240;
(19)[(17)] "Signature" means the application of letters or numbers that signify the intent
to sign, are uniquely linked to the signer, and are:
(a) Produced by manual or handwritten means;
(b) An image of the manual or handwritten signature produced under paragraph
(a) of this subsection; or
(c) Produced by using a digital signature scheme or electronic confirmation
method that allows for verification of authenticity;
(20)[(18)] "Small business" means a business entity, including its affiliates, that:
(a) Is independently owned and operated; and
(b) 1. Employs fewer than one hundred fifty (150) full-time employees or their
equivalent; or
Page 8 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
2. Has gross annual sales of less than six million dollars ($6,000,000);
(21)[(19)] "Statement of consideration" means the document required by KRS 13A.280
in which the administrative body summarizes the comments received, its responses
to those comments, and the action taken, if any, as a result of those comments and
responses;
(22)[(20)] "Subcommittee" means the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee
of the Legislative Research Commission;
(23)[(21)] "Tiering" means the tailoring of regulatory requirements to fit the particular
circumstances surrounding regulated entities; and
(24)[(22)] "Written comments" means comments submitted to the administrative body's
contact person identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d) via hand delivery, United
States mail, email, or facsimile and may include but is not limited to comments
submitted internally from within the promulgating administrative body or from
another administrative body.
Section 5. KRS 13A.040 is amended to read as follows:
The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall appoint an administrative
regulations compiler who shall:
(1) Receive administrative regulations, and other documents required to be filed by the
provisions of this chapter, tendered for filing;
(2) Stamp administrative regulations tendered for filing with the time and date of
receipt;
(3) Provide administrative and support services to the subcommittee;
(4) Maintain a file of administrative regulations and other documents required to be
filed by this chapter, for public inspection, with suitable indexes;
(5) Maintain a file of ineffective administrative regulations;
(6) Maintain a file of material incorporated by reference, including superseded or
ineffective material incorporated by reference;
Page 9 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
(7) Prepare the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;
(8) Upon request, certify copies of administrative regulations and other documents that
have been filed with the regulations compiler;
(9) Correct errors that do not change the substance of an administrative regulation,
including but not limited to typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical
errors;
(10) (a) Change the following items in an administrative regulation in response to a
specific written request for a technical amendment submitted by the
administrative body if the regulations compiler determines that the requested
changes do not affect the scope or substance of the administrative regulation
and the changes are provided in accordance with KRS 13A.312(3):
1. The administrative body's identifying information, including address,
phone number, fax number, website address, and email address;
2. Typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical errors;
3. Citations to statutes or other administrative regulations if a format
change within that statute or administrative regulation has changed the
numbering or lettering of parts; or
4. Other changes in accordance with KRS 13A.312; and
(b) Notify the administrative body within thirty (30) business days of receipt of a
technical amendment letter the status of the request, including:
1. Any requested changes that are accepted as technical amendments; and
2. Any requested changes that are not accepted as technical amendments;
(11) Refuse to accept for filing administrative regulations, and other documents required
to be filed by this chapter, that do not conform to the drafting, formatting, or filing
requirements established by the provisions of KRS 13A.105, 13A.190(5) to (11),
13A.220, 13A.222(1), (2), and (3), 13A.230, 13A.280, 13A.312, and 13A.320, and
notify the administrative body in writing of the reasons for refusing to accept an
Page 10 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
administrative regulation for filing;
(12) Maintain a list of all administrative regulation numbers and the corresponding last
effective date, based on the information included in the history line of each
administrative regulation;[ and]
(13) Maintain a list of all administrative regulations that have been ratified and
granted final legislative approval or disapproval through the process established
in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act, and the effective date of each ratification; and
(14) Perform other duties required by the Commission or by a legislative committee.
Section 6. KRS 13A.3102 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) An ordinary administrative regulation with a last effective date on or after
March 1, 2013, shall expire seven (7) years after its last effective date, except
as provided by the certification process in KRS 13A.3104.
(b) Beginning on April 1, 2027, an administrative regulation shall be ratified in
the latest enacted version of the legislation authorized under Section 3 of
this Act to be eligible under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) For purposes of this chapter, the "last effective date" shall not include any
administrative regulation effective date established by final legislative
approval or the ratification process in legislation established in Sections 1 to
3 of this Act.
(2) An ordinary administrative regulation with a last effective date before March 1,
2013, shall expire on March 1, 2020, except as provided by the certification process
in KRS 13A.3104.
(3) For all administrative regulations that expire under this section or KRS 13A.3104,
the regulations compiler shall:
(a) Delete them from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;
(b) Add them to the list of ineffective administrative regulations; and
(c) Beginning on September 1, 2020, and at least once every six (6) months
Page 11 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
thereafter, publish a list of administrative regulations that have expired since
the most recent previous list was published under this paragraph.
(4) Within three (3) months of June 27, 2019, and at least once every six (6) months
thereafter, the regulations compiler shall publish a list of existing administrative
regulations and their corresponding last effective dates.
Section 7. KRS 13A.331 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A filed ordinary administrative regulation that has not been deferred or found
deficient and has been referred by the Commission to a legislative committee shall
be considered as adopted and shall become effective:
(a)[(1)] Upon adjournment of a meeting of a legislative committee other than the
subcommittee if:
1.[(a)] The administrative regulation was on the meeting agenda; and
2.[(b)] A quorum was present;
(b)[(2)] Upon adjournment of a meeting of a House or Senate standing
committee if:
1.[(a)] The administrative regulation was on its meeting agenda;
2.[(b)] A quorum was present; and
3.[(c)] The administrative regulation has previously been on a meeting
agenda of the other standing committee when a quorum was present; or
(c)[(3)] At the expiration of the review period established in KRS 13A.290(7), if
within the review period a legislative committee has failed to meet or failed to
place a filed administrative regulation on a meeting agenda.
(2) Any adoption or effective status for an administrative regulation under this
section shall be subject to and superseded by any subsequent ratification or
disapproval of the administrative regulation through enacted legislation in
accordance with Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
Section 8. KRS 13A.190 is amended to read as follows:
Page 12 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
(1) An emergency administrative regulation is an administrative regulation that:
(a) An administrative body can clearly demonstrate, through documentary
evidence submitted with the filing of the emergency administrative regulation,
must be placed into effect immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, welfare, or the
environment;
2. Prevent an imminent loss of federal or state funds;
3. Meet an imminent deadline for the promulgation of an administrative
regulation that is established by state statute or federal law; or
4. Comply with an executive order issued under KRS Chapter 39A; and
(b) 1. Is temporary in nature and will expire as provided in this section; or
2. Is temporary in nature and will be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation as provided in this section.
For the purposes of this section, "imminent" means within two hundred seventy
(270) days of the filing of the emergency administrative regulation.
(2) An agency's finding of an emergency pursuant to this section shall not be based on
the agency's failure to timely process and file administrative regulations through the
ordinary administrative regulation process.
(3) An emergency administrative regulation:
(a) Shall become effective and shall be considered as adopted upon filing;
(b) Shall be published in the Administrative Register in accordance with the
publication deadline established in KRS 13A.050(3);
(c) Shall be subject to the public comment provisions established in KRS
13A.270 and 13A.280;
(d) 1. May be reviewed at a subsequent meeting of a legislative committee
after the filing of the emergency administrative regulation; and
2. May, by a vote of the majority of the legislative committee's
Page 13 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
membership as established by KRS 13A.020(4) and 13A.290(9), be
found to be deficient, and the deficiency shall be reported to the
Governor pursuant to KRS 13A.330(2); and
(e) May be amended:
1. By the promulgating administrative body after receiving public
comments as established in KRS 13A.280. The amended after
comments version shall:
a. Become effective upon filing; and
b. Not require a statement of emergency; or
2. At a legislative committee meeting as established in KRS 13A.320. The
amendment shall be approved as established by KRS 13A.020(4) or
KRS 13A.290(9). The amended version shall become effective upon
adjournment of the meeting following the procedures established in
KRS 13A.020(4) or 13A.331(1)(a) and (b)[(2)].
(4) (a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, emergency
administrative regulations shall expire two hundred seventy (270) days after
the date of filing or when the same matter filed as an ordinary administrative
regulation filed for review is adopted, whichever occurs first.
(b) If an administrative body extends the time for filing a statement of
consideration for an ordinary administrative regulation as provided by KRS
13A.280(2)(b), an emergency administrative regulation shall remain in effect
for two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of filing plus the number of
days extended under the provisions of KRS 13A.280(2)(b) or when the same
matter filed as an ordinary administrative regulation filed for review is
adopted, whichever occurs first.
(c) Filing an emergency amended after comments administrative regulation shall
not affect the expiration of an emergency regulation as established in
Page 14 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(5) Except as established in subsection (6) of this section, an emergency administrative
regulation with the same number or title or governing the same subject matter shall
not be filed for a period of two hundred seventy (270) days after it has been initially
filed.
(6) If an emergency administrative regulation with the same number or title or
governing the same subject matter as an emergency administrative regulation filed
within the previous two hundred seventy (270) days is filed, it shall contain a
detailed explanation of the manner in which it differs from the previously filed
emergency administrative regulation. The detailed explanation shall be included in
the statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section.
(7) Each emergency administrative regulation shall contain a statement of:
(a) The nature of the emergency;
(b) The reasons why an ordinary administrative regulation is not sufficient;
(c) Whether or not the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by
an ordinary administrative regulation;
(d) If the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation, the following statement: "The ordinary
administrative regulation (is or is not) identical to this emergency
administrative regulation.";
(e) If the emergency administrative regulation will not be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation, the reasons therefor; and
(f) If applicable, the explanation required by subsection (6) of this section.
(8) (a) An administrative body shall attach the:
1. Statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section to the
front of the original and each copy of a proposed emergency
administrative regulation;
Page 15 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
2. Public hearing and public comment period information required by KRS
13A.270(2), regulatory impact analysis, tiering statement, federal
mandate comparison, fiscal note, summary of material incorporated by
reference if applicable, and other forms or documents required by the
provisions of this chapter to the back of the emergency administrative
regulation; and
3. Documentary evidence submitted justifying the finding of an emergency
in accordance with subsection (1) of this section to the back of the
emergency regulation if it is:
a. No more than ten (10) pages in length; and
b. Typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by
eleven (11) inches, and single-sided.
Larger volumes of documentary evidence shall be filed in a separate
binder, on a CD-ROM or DVD disc, or in a different electronic format
approved by the regulations compiler.
(b) An administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:
1. The original and four (4) copies of the emergency administrative
regulation; and
2. At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an electronic
version of the emergency administrative regulation and the attachments
required by paragraph (a) of this subsection saved as a single document
for each emergency administrative regulation in an electronic format
approved by the regulations compiler.
(c) 1. Each original emergency administrative regulation shall be single-sided
and stapled in the top left corner.
2. One (1) of the copies shall be single-sided and unstapled.
3. The other three (3) copies shall be stapled in the top left corner and may
Page 16 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
be double-sided.
4. The original and the four (4) copies of each emergency administrative
regulation shall be grouped together.
(9) The statement of emergency shall have a two (2) inch top margin. The number of
the emergency administrative regulation shall be typed directly below the heading
"Statement of Emergency." The number of the emergency administrative regulation
shall be the same number as the ordinary administrative regulation followed by an
"E."
(10) Each executive department emergency administrative regulation shall be signed by
the head of the administrative body and countersigned by the Governor prior to
filing with the Commission. These signatures shall be on the statement of
emergency attached to the front of the emergency administrative regulation.
(11) If an emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation, the ordinary administrative regulation shall be filed at the
same time as the emergency administrative regulation that it will replace.
(12) If an ordinary administrative regulation that was filed to replace an emergency
administrative regulation:
(a) Is withdrawn:
1. The emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date the
ordinary administrative regulation is withdrawn; and
2. The administrative body shall inform the regulations compiler of the
reasons for withdrawal in writing; or
(b) Expires, the emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date the
ordinary administrative regulation expires pursuant to KRS 13A.315(1).
(13) (a) If an emergency administrative regulation that was intended to be replaced by
an ordinary administrative regulation is withdrawn, the emergency
administrative regulation shall expire on the date it is withdrawn.
Page 17 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 5
(b) If an emergency administrative regulation has been withdrawn, the ordinary
administrative regulation that was filed with it shall not expire unless the
administrative body informs the regulations compiler that the ordinary
administrative regulation is also withdrawn.
(c) If an emergency administrative regulation is withdrawn, the administrative
body shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in
writing.
(14) The administrative regulations compiler shall notify all legislative committees of
the number, title, and subject matter of all emergency administrative regulations
and shall forward any additional information filed about the emergency
administrative regulation requested by a legislative committee.
Page 18 of 18
BR000500.100 - 5 - XXXX 2/2/2026 12:11 PM Jacketed